public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec2.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX A ertir artíe/JL [^àbcdđeéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]vertir
SFX A ertir artíelo/S [^àbcdđeéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]vertir
SFX A ertir artíemi/K [^àbcdđeéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]vertir
SFX A ertir artíi/NP [^àbcdđeéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]vertir
SFX A ertir artíimo/L [^àbcdđeéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]vertir
SFX A ertir artíimoi/M [^àbcdđeéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]vertir
SFX A ertir artíitu/O [^àbcdđeéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]vertir
SFX A ertir artímoi/M [^àbcdđeéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]vertir
SFX A ertir artíndome/G [^àbcdđeéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]vertir
SFX A ertir artíndomene/G [^àbcdđeéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]vertir
SFX A ertir artío/JL [^àbcdđeéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]vertir
SFX A ertir artíomi/K [^àbcdđeéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]vertir
SFX A ertir artírmene/G [^àbcdđeéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]vertir
SFX A ertir artíselo/S [^àbcdđeéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]vertir
SFX A ertir artísemi/K [^àbcdđeéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]vertir
SFX A ertir artísime/H [^àbcdđeéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]vertir
SFX A ertir artísimo [^àbcdđeéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]vertir
SFX A ertir artísitu/O [^àbcdđeéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]vertir
SFX A ertir artísomi/K [^àbcdđeéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]vertir
SFX A ertir artíu/Q [^àbcdđeéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]vertir
SFX A ertir artívami/K [^àbcdđeéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]vertir
SFX A ertir artívau/Q [^àbcdđeéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]vertir
SFX A ertir artívelo/S [^àbcdđeéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]vertir
SFX A ertir artívemi/K [^àbcdđeéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]vertir
SFX A ertir artívimo/L [^àbcdđeéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]vertir
SFX A ertir artívimoi/M [^àbcdđeéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]vertir
SFX A ertir artívitu/O [^àbcdđeéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]vertir
SFX A ertir artívomi/K [^àbcdđeéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]vertir
SFX A ertonar artona/FR bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonada bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonade bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonadi bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonado bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonando/E bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonante bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonar/E bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonaralo/S bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonarami/K bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonaratu/O bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonarave/RT bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonare bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonaremo/L bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonaren/L bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonareni/M bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonarense bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonaresi/P bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonaresiu/Q bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonarion/L bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonarioni/M bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonarionse bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonarisen/L bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonariseni/M bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonarisense bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonarision/L bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonarisioni/M bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonarisionse bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonarisié/P bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonarisiéu/Q bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonarison/L bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonarisoni/M bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonarisonse bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonarié/P bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonariéu/Q bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonarme/G bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonaron/L bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonaroni/M bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonaronse bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonarà/JLNR bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonaràe/R bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonarè/JL bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonarèmi/K bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonaré/P bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonarémoi/M bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonarésimo/L bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonarésimoi/M bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonaréu/Q bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonaría/JLNR bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonaríami/K bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonaríatu/O bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonaríe/JLR bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonaríelo/S bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonaríemi/K bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonarò/JL bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonaròmi/K bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonase/I bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonasi bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonasta/I bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonaste/I bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonasti/I bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonasto/I bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonava/JLPR bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonave/JL bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonavi/NP bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonavo/JL bertonar
SFX A ertonar artone/IJLR bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonede bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonege bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonemo/L bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonen/L bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonendo/E bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonene bertonar
SFX A ertonar artoneni/M bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonense bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonese/I bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonesi bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonesta/I bertonar
SFX A ertonar artoneste/I bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonesti/I bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonesto/I bertonar
SFX A ertonar artoneva/JLPR bertonar
SFX A ertonar artoneve/JL bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonevi/NP bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonevo/JL bertonar
SFX A ertonar artoni/N bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonion/L bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonione bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonioni/M bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonionse bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonisen/L bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonisene bertonar
SFX A ertonar artoniseni/M bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonisense bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonision/L bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonisione bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonisioni/M bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonisionse bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonisié/P bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonisiéde/P bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonisiége/P bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonison/L bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonisone bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonisoni/M bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonisonse bertonar
SFX A ertonar artoniven/L bertonar
SFX A ertonar artoniveni/M bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonivense bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonivion/L bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonivioni/M bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonivionse bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonivié/P bertonar
SFX A ertonar artoniviéu/Q bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonivon/L bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonivoni/M bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonivonse bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonié/P bertonar
SFX A ertonar artoniéde/P bertonar
SFX A ertonar artoniége/P bertonar
SFX A ertonar artoniéu/Q bertonar
SFX A ertonar artono/JL bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonon/L bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonone bertonar
SFX A ertonar artononi/M bertonar
SFX A ertonar artononse bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonà bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàa/JLPR bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàami/K bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàau/Q bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàe/JL bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàelo/S bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàemi/K bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonài/NP bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàimo/L bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàimoi/M bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàitu/O bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàndome/G bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàndomene/G bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonào/JL bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàomi/K bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàrmene/G bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàsimo bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàvami/K bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàvau/Q bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàvelo/S bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàvemi/K bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàvimo/L bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàvimoi/M bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàvitu/O bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonàvomi/K bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonè/FP bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonème/H bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonèu/Q bertonar
SFX A ertonar artoné/FP bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonéa/JLPR bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonéami/K bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonéau/Q bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonée/JL bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonéelo/S bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonéemi/K bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonéi/NP bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonéimo/L bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonéimoi/M bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonéitu/O bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonémoi/M bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonéndome/G bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonéndomene/G bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonéo/JL bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonéomi/K bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonésimo bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonéu/Q bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonévami/K bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonévau/Q bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonévelo/S bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonévemi/K bertonar
SFX A ertonar artonévimo/L bertonar
