public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec2.dic
albergar/A
alterar/A
anaƚixar/A
arbitrar/A
argomentar/A
asénter/A
asidar/A
inaxear/A
bagatelar/A
baketar/A
baƚegar/A
inbalordir/A
baƚukar/A
xbanpir/A
barbajar/A
xbarufar/A
dexbatexar/A
inbaukar/A
baxotar/A
bendar/A
xbesolar/A
biankiđar/A
xbiƚansar/A
inbirir/A
xbixigoƚar/A
rebojir/A
dexbolar/A
bonbar/A
bordeđar/A
xboskar/A
inboŧar/A
bragar/A
sbrankar/A
dexbraxoƚar/A
broar/A
brovar/A
bruskar/A
bulegar/A
inbuxar/A
scapar/A
celerar/A
inkoncéñer/A
cinconar/A
dar/A	po:verb
dasiar/A
destreɉar/A
dindoƚar/A
dojiđar/A
radolsir/A
dorar/A
drapar/A
prededúxer/A
inxaltronar/A
dogar/A
adónxer/A
xornalixar/A
đurar/A
edukar/A
riensir/A
eternixar/A
asuefar/A
faeƚar/A
sfalsar/A
infangar/A
faturar/A
edifegar/A
fegurar/A
deferir/A
infestonar/A
sfiankonar/A
fifotar/A
sfilasar/A
fiorir/A
fiskaƚixar/A
fogar/A
infolponar/A
informar/A
fortedar/A
fradeƚixar/A
franŧexar/A
sfraŧar/A
rinfreskar/A
infrolir/A
infugar/A
furegar/A
dexgajar/A
dexgaƚetar/A
xganbarar/A
dexgarbeƚar/A
xgarujar/A
xgianŧar/A
gomitar/A
ingosar/A
ingrandir/A
kongratular/A
dexgređar/A
xgretoƚar/A
xgriñoƚir/A
grongoƚar/A
inguantar/A
guañar/A
inguxelar/A
infestar/A
inprexonar/A
intrar/A
abiurar/A
dexɉaŧar/A
ɉelomarar/A
xjonfar/A
josoƚar/A
inkabalar/A
inkagar/A
kaligar/A
inkalorir/A
kaƚumar/A
kanexar/A
skanpanar/A
kapar/A
deskapriŧiar/A
skaregar/A
karoƚar/A
kartiđar/A
kastronar/A
deskatramar/A
kauteridar/A
skavejar/A
koatar/A
deskoɉonar/A
kolegar/A
rekomandar/A
konbàter/A
konpilar/A
kontixar/A
kòñer/A
inkorajir/A
inkorxar/A
korsixar/A
koŧar/A
skovèrxer/A
krestaƚixar/A
krolar/A
inkrosoƚar/A
inkuartar/A
kuestionar/A
skuƚar/A
kurvar/A
ƚagremar/A
lansar/A
xlargiđar/A
xlaŧar/A
relèđer/A
xlénxer/A
elevar/A
ekuilibrar/A
limar/A
lisegar/A
logar/A
stralosar/A
xlubiar/A
stralúxer/A
xmajar/A
remaner/A
manifestar/A
xmañusar/A
inmarmorir/A
dexmaselar/A
matixar/A
maurar/A
intermeđar/A
menar/A
xmeoƚar/A
dexméter/A
mexurar/A
amirar/A
mojar/A
xmoƚacar/A
xmónder/A
morbar/A
stramortir/A
komòver/A
inmular/A
amutinar/A
naspar/A
negriđar/A
ninoƚar/A
nomenar/A
nudrir/A
ñiñoƚar/A
ofrir/A
omoƚogar/A
onɉar/A
ordar/A
ortigar/A
spacasar/A
pagontar/A
spalar/A
spaƚisar/A
pànder/A
pansar/A
konparer/A
straparlar/A
inparsialixar/A
despastar/A
inpatinar/A
inpaurir/A
arpegar/A
speƚacar/A
inpenir/A
pendolar/A
spentonar/A
perorar/A
repèter/A
despetorar/A
pexar/A
pianđotar/A
repiegar/A
pindoƚar/A
spipoƚar/A
piturar/A
inpisoƚar/A
poƚeɉar/A
spolveriđar/A
propóner/A
strapontar/A
spontonar/A
strasportar/A
inpotegar/A
premiar/A
despreŧiar/A
prontar/A
spulexar/A
deputar/A
inrabiar/A
skoraɉar/A
rantegar/A
raxar/A
dexredar/A
relaŧionar/A
rexegar/A
risar/A
rodar/A
derokir/A
ronkexar/A
derotar/A
irudenir/A
ruñir/A
sagomar/A
desaƚir/A
salmastrar/A
insanguenar/A
saŧiar/A
scenxar/A
sekar/A
konseguir/A
desejar/A
desemenar/A
resentir/A
seraɉar/A
sfarŧar/A
sidiar/A
sindakar/A
sixoƚar/A
skaoƚar/A
iskarseƚar/A
iskenar/A
skoinar/A
skrinŧar/A
skurir/A
resolar/A
solkar/A
insoñar/A
sotilixar/A
desparar/A
spedir/A
ispesionar/A
spionar/A
isporkar/A
movestar/A
stalir/A
konstatar/A
steriƚixar/A
institikir/A
stokar/A
destranir/A
konstrénđer/A
stronsar/A
stufar/A
suàder/A
sunar/A
insutilir/A
retajar/A
destanar/A
taponar/A
tartajar/A
tavanedar/A
intelerar/A
intenerir/A
intentar/A
reteñir/A
astéñer/A
termenar/A
protèxer/A
tiranixar/A
coƚer/A
toniđar/A
torkiar/A
tòrder/A
tosir/A
trabatar/A
trankuilar/A
tratar/A
travajar/A
intreŧar/A
trionfar/A
stronkar/A
desturbar/A
insakoƚar/A
savariar/A
reŧedar/A
konsentrar/A
insercar/A
serpir/A
sexeƚar/A
ŧiganar/A
inŧinganar/A
sirkolar/A
insokir/A
inŧotar/A
ultimar/A
uxar/A
valer/A
revangar/A
varesar/A
stravéder/A
veƚenar/A
inventar/A
dexveñir/A
kontravèñer/A
verdelar/A
xvergoñar/A
verolar/A
envestir/A
dexviar/A
vinasar/A
vitalixar/A
vivatar/A
vokalixar/A
volxar/A
vòlxer/A
traxalir/A
xbarlar/A
xemenar/A
dexiderar/A
xmergolar/A
inxojeƚar/A
àlder/A
invertir/A
variar/A
diferensiar/A
invariar/A
reèser/A
boŧolar/A
gaƚivar/A
inpoɉar/A
mancéner/A
repeƚir/A
skarnar/A
xgamar/A
spantegar/A
tanar/A
brankeđar/A
insaƚar/A
fasetar/A
